Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2303.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 48 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 15TEMPORARY LODGING AT SHORT-TERM RENTALSSubchapterA. General ProvisionsB. Categories and RegulationC. Registry and TrackingD. Safety and InsuranceE. Enforcement and PenaltiesF. Transitional ComplianceSUBCHAPTER A1234567891011121314151617 GENERAL PROVISIONSSec.1501. Definitions.1502. Applicability.1503. Property count and attribution.§ 1501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Booking service." An entity that facilitates or collects payment for hotel accommodations on behalf of or for an operator. The term does not include a person who publishes advertisements for accommodations."Corporate STR operator." As follows:(1) an owner, individual or entity that owns or operates 10 or more short-term rental properties within this Commonwealth; or(2) an owner, individual or entity that operates multiple short-term rental properties within this Commonwealth through separate legal entities under common control."Homestay." A short-term rental in which:(1) The property is the primary residence of the owner. The property may be rented while the owner is present or temporarily absent for a cumulative period not exceeding 30 days in a calendar year.(2) The property is owned by an individual who operates no more than one additional short-term rental property in total beyond the individual's primary residence.(3) No more than one additional property, beyond the 20260HB2303PN3026 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 primary residence, is operated as a short-term rental by the same owner."Operator." A person operating a hotel."Owner." An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity holding legal title to a property or holding an equitable interest under a land contract."Person in charge." As follows:(1) An individual or agent with actual authority to represent the operator for purposes of contact and communication regarding the operator's vacation rental who is:(i) Able to be contacted at all times and arrive at the short-term rental unit within one hour of being contacted.(ii) Able to respond on-site as necessary and authorized to act as a legal agent.(2) The county shall be notified in writing within 14 days of any change of the identity of the person in charge."Primary residence." A dwelling unit in which an owner resides for at least six months in each calendar year."Short-term rental" or "STR." A dwelling unit, or portion of a dwelling unit, that is rented for a period of less than 30 consecutive days to a temporary guest, whether advertised or offered through an online platform, broker or by other means. The term does not include a lodging establishment as defined in section 1311 (relating to hotelkeepers and campground owners)."Vacation rental." A short-term rental operated by an owner who:(1) Owns fewer than 10 short-term rental properties within this Commonwealth.20260HB2303PN3026 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Is not present during guest occupancy.§ 1502. Applicability.(a) Short-term rentals.--This chapter applies to all short-term rentals located within this Commonwealth, except where prohibited by municipal zoning ordinances.(b) Local authority.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of municipalities to:(1) regulate the location and operation of short-term rentals; or(2) prohibit short-term rentals in specified zoning districts.(c) Municipal notice.--A municipality that prohibits or restricts short-term rentals under a zoning ordinance shall provide written notice, including a copy of the applicable zoning ordinance or relevant provisions of the zoning ordinance, of the prohibition or restriction to the county. The county's permitting decisions under this chapter shall be based on the most recent notice received and the county shall not be liable for issuing a permit in the absence of a notice.§ 1503. Property count and attribution.(a) Aggregation.--For purposes of determining the applicable category of a short-term rental operator under this chapter, all short-term rental properties owned or operated by an individual, entity or group of entities under common ownership or control shall be aggregated.(b) Attribution.--Ownership or operation of a short-term rental property through a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust or other legal arrangement in which the individual or entity holds a controlling interest shall be attributed to the individual or entity for purposes of 20260HB2303PN3026 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a).(c) Anti-evasion rule.--The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules to prevent evasion of the requirements of this section through the creation of multiple legal entities, trusts or other arrangements in which the operator holds a controlling interest.SUBCHAPTER BCATEGORIES AND REGULATIONSec.1511. Regulation of homestays.1512. Regulation of vacation rentals.1513. Regulation of corporate STR operators.1514. Permit fees and local authority.§ 1511. Regulation of homestays.(a) Permit required.--A person may not operate a homestay without obtaining an annual permit from the county in which the property is located.(b) Requirements.--An applicant for a homestay permit shall provide two forms of documentation verifying that the property is the applicant's primary residence, as determined by the county and documentation of an annual safety inspection.§ 1512. Regulation of vacation rentals.(a) Permit and licensing.--An owner of a vacation rental shall obtain:(1) A county permit for each property to be renewed annually.(2) Proof of liability insurance as required by section 1531 (relating to minimum insurance coverage).(b) Operational standards.--A vacation rental shall comply with:20260HB2303PN3026 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Local nuisance ordinances.(2) Occupancy limits.(3) Requirements for a designated person in charge.§ 1513. Regulation of corporate STR operators.(a) Enhanced residential safety standards.--A corporate STR operator shall comply with the following safety and operational standards:(1) Requirements for a designated person in charge.(2) Proof of liability insurance as required by section 1531 (relating to minimum insurance coverage).(3) Installation and maintenance of:(i) Smoke detection devices.(ii) Carbon monoxide detection devices, which are either remote-capable or connected to a system capable of remotely monitoring the activation of such alarms.(iii) Noise monitoring devices that measure decibel levels.(iv) Exterior-only video surveillance of building entrances.(4) Any additional safety measures required by the county by regulation consistent with applicable building and fire codes.(5) A monitoring device required under this subsection may not record audio or video within the interior of a dwelling unit.(b) Sanitation.--A corporate STR operator shall:(1) Ensure that each dwelling unit is cleaned and sanitized between rental occupancies in a manner consistent with generally accepted public health practices.(2) Provide freshly laundered linens and towels for each 20260HB2303PN3026 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupancy and maintain sanitary handling and storage practices.(3) Maintain written cleaning protocols and records of unit turnover.(4) Comply with applicable public health requirements issued by the Department of Health.(c) Workforce standards.--A corporate STR operator shall provide training to employees consistent with applicable occupational health and safety standards and maintain documentation of the training.§ 1514. Permit fees and local authority.(a) County authority.--A county may establish permit fees for short-term rentals regulated under this chapter.(b) Municipal authority preserved.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a municipality to require a permit, license or approval for short-term rentals under applicable local ordinance.(c) Use of fees.--Fees imposed by a county or municipality under this section shall be used solely to administer and enforce this chapter, including permitting, inspections and registry operations under section 1521 (relating to municipal registries and data sharing) and compliance enforcement.(d) Reasonableness.--Fees imposed by a county or municipality under this section shall be reasonably related to the actual administrative and enforcement expenses and may not be used as a general revenue source.SUBCHAPTER CREGISTRY AND TRACKINGSec.1521. Municipal registries and data sharing.20260HB2303PN3026 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1521. Municipal registries and data sharing.(a) Local registry required.--A county that permits the operation of short-term rentals shall establish and maintain a registry of all permitted short-term rental units and all hotels and other lodging establishments subject to the hotel occupancy tax within the county's jurisdiction. Each county shall transmit to the Department of Community and Economic Development an annual report of all short-term rentals registered within the county's jurisdiction.(b) Interagency sharing.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall transmit registry and booking-service data collected under this chapter to the Department of Revenue for the limited purpose of ensuring proper administration, collection and enforcement of State and local hotel occupancy taxes.(c) Required host information.--Registration with a county shall, at a minimum, include the following information for each permitted short-term rental unit and each hotel or other lodging establishment subject to the hotel occupancy tax:(1) The name, mailing address, telephone number and email address of the operator.(2) The street address of the short-term rental unit, hotel or lodging establishment, including a unit number if applicable.(3) The total number of bedrooms.(4) The maximum number of overnight guests permitted under applicable municipal occupancy limits or building and fire code requirements.(5) If located in a multiunit structure, the number of dwelling units within that structure being used as short-term 20260HB2303PN3026 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rentals.(6) If different from the owner, the name and 24-hour contact information of a designated person in charge.(7) The short-term rental category under this chapter, if applicable.(8) The municipal permit or license number.(9) An attestation that liability insurance meeting section 1531 (relating to minimum insurance coverage) is in force, with proof made available to the county or municipality upon request.(10) The date and result of the most recent required safety inspection, if applicable.(d) County tax administration authority.--In addition to the registration information required under subsection (c), a county may, by ordinance, require an operator or booking service to provide supplementary information necessary to administer or audit the collection of county-imposed hotel occupancy taxes. The following shall apply:(1) A county ordinance adopted under this subsection may require the inclusion of the following data with each monthly or periodic report:(i) The accommodation fee.(ii) The discount room rate.(iii) The amount of taxes collected on behalf of the operator.(2) Records or information received by a county under this subsection shall be used solely for the purpose of administering and auditing county hotel-occupancy tax collections and shall not be accessible for inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), 20260HB2303PN3026 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Right-to-Know Law.(e) Booking service accountability.--(1) A booking service facilitating the listing, advertisement or rental of short-term rentals located in this Commonwealth shall, on a monthly basis, provide to the Department of Community and Economic Development and each county in which listings are located an electronic report, in a form and manner determined by the Department of Community and Economic Development, identifying for the applicable reporting period:(i) A registered short-term rental's address and permit number issued in a form and manner determined by the Department of Community and Economic Development.(ii) Whether the listing is for a full dwelling unit or a portion of the dwelling.(iii) The total number of nights the unit was booked or occupied.(2) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall maintain and publish a current list of county contacts designated to receive reports under this subsection, and each county shall provide the Department of Community and Economic Development with updated contact information as necessary.(3) The Department of Community and Economic Development shall make available to booking services an electronic verification system to confirm the registration status and permit number of a short-term rental. A booking service shall not collect or receive a fee, list, advertise, process a reservation for or otherwise facilitate the rental of a property that lacks a current, valid municipal permit or registration under this chapter.20260HB2303PN3026 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A booking service shall collect and remit all State and local hotel occupancy taxes on short-term rental transactions unless the owner demonstrates direct remittance. If a booking service, acting for an operator, collects payment for rent, the booking service shall collect and remit:(i) The taxes imposed under section 210(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(ii) Any additional or optional hotel taxes authorized under any of the following:(A) the act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code;(B) the act of June 5, 1991 (P.L.9, No.6), known as the Pennsylvania Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority Act for Cities of the First Class;(C) the act of December 21, 1998 (P.L.1307, No.174), known as the Community and Economic Improvement Act;(D) 16 Pa.C.S. Chs. 173 (relating to third class county convention center authorities) and 175 (relating to hotel tax); or(E) 64 Pa.C.S. Ch. 60 (relating to Pennsylvania Convention Center Authority).(5) Reports and records provided under this subsection shall be published on an official municipal website or in another publicly accessible format. Personally identifiable contact information of the operator, including telephone number and email address, shall be redacted or excluded from public display, provided that the redacted information shall 20260HB2303PN3026 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remain available to enforcement officials upon request. The publication requirement under this paragraph shall not apply to homestay rentals, provided that complete registry information remains available to municipal and State enforcement officials.(f) Public safety use.--Registry and booking-service reports collected under this section may be shared by the Department of Community and Economic Development and by counties with State, county and municipal agencies for emergency response, disaster recovery, public health investigations and code enforcement purposes.(g) Confidentiality of tax-related data.--Information shared with the Department of Revenue under subsection (b) shall be considered taxpayer information and subject to all applicable confidentiality protections under State law.SUBCHAPTER DSAFETY AND INSURANCESec.1531. Minimum insurance coverage.1532. Safety standards.1533. Inspections.§ 1531. Minimum insurance coverage.(a) Requirement.--All short-term rentals, except homestays, shall maintain liability insurance coverage in an amount not less than $500,000 per occurrence.(b) Proof.--Proof of coverage shall be provided at the time of permit application and upon renewal.§ 1532. Safety standards.(a) Requirements.--A short-term rental shall:(1) Provide functioning smoke and carbon monoxide 20260HB2303PN3026 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detectors.(2) Provide accessible fire extinguishers.(3) Maintain safe and unobstructed means of egress.(4) Comply with maximum occupancy limits established by local ordinance or applicable building or fire code standards.(5) Have an evacuation map posted in a conspicuous location within the short-term rental unit that identifies emergency exits and egress routes.(b) Human trafficking prevention.--An operator of a short-term rental shall complete human trafficking awareness training approved by the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency and shall post information on the National Human Trafficking Hotline in a conspicuous location within the short-term rental unit. Compliance with this subsection shall be a condition of permitting under this chapter.(c) Enforcement.--Compliance with this section shall be verified through the permitting, inspection or attestation processes established under this chapter and may be enforced by municipalities or counties as provided under this chapter. Counties shall establish a process to receive and investigate complaints alleging noncompliance with this chapter and may take enforcement action consistent with this chapter, including issuance of notices of violation, civil penalties or suspension or revocation of permits, subject to notice and an opportunity to cure or be heard.§ 1533. Inspections.Documentation verifying compliance and applicable fire, safety and housing codes shall be provided by the owner or operator as part of the permitting process under this chapter. 20260HB2303PN3026 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Documentation shall consist of one of the following:(1) an inspection conducted by the municipality;(2) an inspection conducted by a licensed third party; or(3) except for corporate STR operators, an attestation by the owner or operator that the property complies with applicable codes, subject to verification or inspection by the municipality or the Department of Community and Economic Development.SUBCHAPTER EENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIESSec.1541. Enforcement.1542. Penalties.§ 1541. Enforcement.(a) Primary enforcement.--The Department of Community and Economic Development shall have primary authority to enforce the requirements of this chapter.(b) Local authority preserved.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of a municipality or county to enforce zoning, building, fire, nuisance, licensing or other applicable local ordinances, or to enforce compliance with permit or registration requirements established under this chapter.§ 1542. Penalties.(a) Civil penalty.--A violation of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $2,000 per violation.(b) Injunctive relief.--A court of competent jurisdiction may enjoin the continued operation of a noncompliant short-term rental.20260HB2303PN3026 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Suspension or revocation of permits.--A county shall enforce permitting requirements and take enforcement actions consistent with applicable local ordinances, including suspension or revocation of permits.SUBCHAPTER FTRANSITIONAL COMPLIANCESec.1551. Time period for compliance.§ 1551. Time period for compliance.An operator of a short-term rental unit in operation prior to the effective date of this section shall be required to be in compliance with all applicable provisions of this chapter as follows:(1) Homestay operators, 12 months after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Vacation rental operators, six months after the effective date of this paragraph.(3) Corporate STR operators, six months after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2303PN3026 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920